apertium-is-en.is.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AÁBDÐEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓPRSTUÚVXYÝÞÆÖaábdðeéfghiíjklmnoóprstuúvxyýþæöWZQCwzqcøØåÅ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="pr"   c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="prn"   c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="n"   c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np"   c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="ij"   c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="adj"   c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="det"   c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="adv"   c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv"   c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="num"   c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux"   c="Auxiliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver"   c="The verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="p1"   c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2"   c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3"   c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="f"   c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="m"   c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt"   c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="mf"   c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="sg"   c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl"   c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp"   c="Singular / plural"/> 
    <sdef n="ref"   c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="pos"   c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="dem"   c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"   c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="itg"   c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="ind"   c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="def"   c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="ord"   c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="nom"   c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="acc"   c="Accusative"/> 
    <sdef n="dat"   c="Dative"/> 
    <sdef n="gen"   c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="inf"   c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp"   c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pri"   c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="prs"   c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pss"   c="Past subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pp"   c="Participle"/> 
    <sdef n="ger"   c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="top"   c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="ant"   c="Antonym"/> 
    <sdef n="cog"   c="Cognomen"/> 
    <sdef n="al"   c="Altres"/> 
    <sdef n="sta"   c="Strong inflection"/> 
    <sdef n="vei"   c="Weak inflection"/> 
    <sdef n="pst"   c="Positive"/> 
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="sup"   c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence marker"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Numbers -->
    
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re><p><l>°C</l><r>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Numerals -->
    
    <pardef n="ei/nn__num">
      <e>       <p><l>nn</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nn</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>num</l>       <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nni</l>       <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nnar</l>      <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nu</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>nn<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="tv/eir__num">
      <e>       <p><l>eir</l>       <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ær</l>        <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ær</l>        <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>eimur</l>     <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eggja</l>     <r>eir<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="þr/ír__num">
      <e>       <p><l>ír</l>        <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>já</l>        <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>jár</l>       <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jár</l>       <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>jú</l>        <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jú</l>        <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e r="LR"><p><l>em</l>        <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emur</l>      <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iggja</l>     <r>ír<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fj/órir__num">
      <e>       <p><l>órir</l>      <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>óra</l>       <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>órar</l>      <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>órar</l>      <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ögur</l>      <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögur</l>      <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>órum</l>      <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögurra</l>    <r>órir<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="fimm__num">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="hundrað__num">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    
    
        <!-- Pronouns -->
    

    <e lm="einn">            <i>ei</i><par n="ei/nn__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tveir">           <i>tv</i><par n="tv/eir__num"/></e>
    <e lm="þrír">            <i>þr</i><par n="þr/ír__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjórir">          <i>fj</i><par n="fj/órir__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fimm">            <i>fimm</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sex">             <i>sex</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sjö">             <i>sjö</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="átta">            <i>átta</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="níu">             <i>níu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tíu">             <i>tíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ellefu">          <i>ellefu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tólf">            <i>tólf</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="þrettán">         <i>þrettán</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjórtán">         <i>fjórtán</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fimmtán">         <i>fimmtán</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sextán">          <i>sextán</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sautján">         <i>sautján</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="átján">           <i>átján</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nítján">          <i>nítján</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tuttugu">         <i>tuttugu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="þrjátíu">         <i>þrjátíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjörutíu">        <i>fjörutíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fimmtíu">         <i>fimmtíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sextíu">          <i>sextíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sjötíu">          <i>sjötíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="áttatíu">         <i>áttatíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="níutíu">          <i>níutíu</i><par n="fimm__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hundrað">         <i>hundrað</i><par n="hundrað__num"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
